Hawaii statutes.
§10-6 General duties of the board. (a)
The general duties of the board shall be:

(1) To develop and continually update a strategic
plan for the office that shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(A) Compilation of basic demographic data on
native Hawaiians and Hawaiians;

(B) Identification of the physical,
sociological, psychological, and economic needs of native Hawaiians and
Hawaiians;

(C) Establishment of long-range goals for the
office's programs and services for native Hawaiians and Hawaiians;

(D) Establishment of priorities and
alternatives for the office's program and service implementation; and

(E) Organization of the office's
administrative and program structure, including the use of facilities and
personnel;

(2) To assist in the development of state and county
agency plans for native Hawaiian and Hawaiian programs and services;

(3) To maintain an inventory of federal, state,
county, and private programs and services for Hawaiians and native Hawaiians
and act as a clearinghouse and referral agency;

(4) To advise and inform federal, state, and county
officials about native Hawaiian and Hawaiian programs, and coordinate federal,
state, and county activities relating to native Hawaiians and Hawaiians;

(5) To conduct, encourage, and maintain research
relating to native Hawaiians and Hawaiians;

(6) To develop and review models for comprehensive
native Hawaiian and Hawaiian programs;

(7) To act as a clearinghouse for applications for
federal or state assistance to carry out native Hawaiian or Hawaiian programs
or projects;

(8) To apply for, accept and administer any federal
funds made available or allotted under any federal act for native Hawaiians or
Hawaiians; and

(9) To promote and assist the establishment of
agencies to serve native Hawaiians and Hawaiians.

(b) The board shall have any powers which may
be necessary for the full and effective performance and discharge of the duties
imposed by this chapter, and which may be necessary to fully and completely
effectuate the purposes of this chapter. [L 1979, c 196, pt of §2; am L 2006, c
2, §1]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next